Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2121.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 8-143 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-143.
(a) All applications for the registration of motorcycles, motorized bicycles
and passenger vehicles other than trucks and truck tractors, except as
otherwise provided, shall be accompanied by an annual license fee as
follows:
(1) Prior to January 1, 2020:
(A) For motorized bicycles, $11;
(B) for motorcycles, $16;
(C) for passenger vehicles, other than motorcycles, used solely for the
carrying of persons for pleasure or business, and for hearses and
ambulances a fee of:
(i) For those having a gross weight of 4,500 pounds or less, $30; and
(ii) for those having a gross weight of more than 4,500 pounds, $40.
(D) Except for motor vehicles, trailers or semitrailers registered under
the provisions of K.S.A. 8-1,134, and amendments thereto, the annual
registration fee for each motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer owned by any
political or taxing subdivision of this state or by any agency or
instrumentality of any one or more political or taxing subdivisions of this
state and used exclusively for governmental purposes and not for any
private or utility purposes, that is not otherwise exempt from registration,
shall be $2.
(2) On and after January 1, 2020:
(A) For motorized bicycles, $11;
(B)(2) for motorcycles, $16;
(3) for those motorcycles that are all-electric motorcycles, $30;

HB 2121—Am. by SC 2
(C)(4) for passenger vehicles, other than motorcycles, used solely for
the carrying of persons for pleasure or business, and for hearses and
ambulances a fee of:
(i)(A) For those having a gross weight of 4,500 pounds or less, $30;
(ii)(B) for those having a gross weight of more than 4,500 pounds,
$40;
(iii)(C) for those motor vehicles that are electric hybrid vehicles,
$85 $50;
(D) for those motor vehicles that are electric hybrid or plug-in electric
hybrid vehicles, $50 $100; and
(iv)(D)(E) for those motor vehicles that are all-electric vehicles,
$100. $175 $165; and
(D)(5) except for motor vehicles, trailers or semitrailers registered
under the provisions of K.S.A. 8-1,134, and amendments thereto, the
annual registration fee for each motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer owned
by any political or taxing subdivision of this state or by any agency or
instrumentality of any one or more political or taxing subdivisions of this
state and used exclusively for governmental purposes and not for any
private or utility purposes, that is not otherwise exempt from registration,
shall be $2.
(b) (1) As used in this subsection, the term "gross weight" shall mean
and include the empty weight of the truck, or combination of the truck or
truck tractor and any type trailer or semitrailer, plus the maximum weight
of cargo which will be transported on or with the same, except when the
empty weight of a truck plus the maximum weight of cargo which will be
transported thereon is 12,000 pounds or less. The term gross weight shall
not include: The weight of any travel trailer propelled thereby which is
being used for private recreational purposes; or the weight of any vehicle
or combination of vehicles for which wrecker or towing service, as defined
in K.S.A. 66-1329, and amendments thereto, is to be provided by a
wrecker or tow truck, as defined in K.S.A. 66-1329, and amendments
thereto. Such wrecker or tow truck shall be registered for the empty weight
of such vehicle fully equipped for the recovery or towing of vehicles. The
gross weight license fees hereinafter prescribed shall only apply to the
truck or truck tractor used as the propelling unit for the cargo and vehicle
propelled, either as a single vehicle or combination of vehicles. On
application for the registration of a truck or truck tractor, the owner thereof
shall declare as a part of such application the maximum gross weight the
owner desires to be applicable to such vehicle, which declared gross
weight in no event shall be in excess of the limitations described by K.S.A.
8-1908 and 8-1909, and amendments thereto, for such vehicle or
combination of vehicles of which it will be a part. All applications for the
registration of trucks or truck tractors, except as otherwise provided

HB 2121—Am. by SC 3
herein, shall be accompanied by an annual license fee as follows:
For a gross weight of 12,000 lbs. or less unless otherwise provided ............
.............................................................................................................$40
For a gross weight of 12,000 lbs or less and the truck
or truck tractor is an electric hybrid or plug-in electric hybrid.........125
For a gross weight of 12,000 lbs or less and the truck
or truck tractor is all-electric.............................................................200
For a gross weight of more than 12,000 lbs. and not
more than 16,000 lbs. .........................................................................202
For a gross weight of more than 16,000 lbs. and not
more than 20,000 lbs. .........................................................................232
For a gross weight of more than 20,000 lbs. and not
more than 24,000 lbs...........................................................................297
For a gross weight of more than 24,000 lbs. and not
more than 26,000 lbs...........................................................................412
For a gross weight of more than 26,000 lbs. and not
more than 30,000 lbs...........................................................................412
For a gross weight of more than 30,000 lbs. and not
more than 36,000 lbs...........................................................................475
For a gross weight of more than 36,000 lbs. and not
more than 42,000 lbs. .........................................................................575
For a gross weight of more than 42,000 lbs. and not
more than 48,000 lbs. .........................................................................705
For a gross weight of more than 48,000 lbs. and not
more than 54,000 lbs...........................................................................905
For a gross weight of more than 54,000 lbs. and not
more than 60,000 lbs........................................................................1,145
For a gross weight of more than 60,000 lbs. and not
more than 66,000 lbs. ......................................................................1,345
For a gross weight of more than 66,000 lbs. and not
more than 74,000 lbs. ......................................................................1,670
For a gross weight of more than 74,000 lbs. and not
more than 80,000 lbs. ......................................................................1,870
For a gross weight of more than 80,000 lbs. and not
more than 85,500 lbs........................................................................2,070
(2) If the applicant for registration of any truck or truck tractor for a
gross weight of more than 12,000 pounds in the state of Kansas or any
political or taxing subdivision or agency of the state, except a city or
county, whose truck or truck tractor is not otherwise entitled to the $2
license fee or otherwise exempt from all fees, such vehicle may be
licensed for a fee in accordance with the schedule hereinafter prescribed
for local trucks or truck tractors.
(3) If the applicant for registration of any truck or truck tractor for a

HB 2121—Am. by SC 4
gross weight of more than 12,000 pounds shall under oath state in writing
on a form prescribed and furnished by the director of vehicles that the
applicant does not expect to operate it more than 6,000 miles in the
calendar year for which the applicant seeks registration, and that if the
applicant shall operate it more than 6,000 miles during such registration
year such applicant will pay an additional fee equal to the fee required by
the schedule under paragraph (1), less the amount of the fee paid at time of
registration, such vehicle may be licensed for a fee in accordance with the
schedule prescribed for local trucks or truck tractors. Whenever a truck or
truck tractor is registered on a local truck or truck tractor fee basis a tab or
marker shall be issued in connection with the regular license plate, which
tab or marker shall be attached or affixed to and displayed with the regular
license plate and the failure to have the same attached, affixed or displayed
shall be subject to the same penalties as provided by law for the failure to
display the regular license plate; and the secretary of revenue may adopt
rules and regulations requiring the owners of trucks and truck tractors so
registered on a local truck or truck tractor fee basis to keep such records
and make such reports of mileage of such vehicles as the secretary of
revenue shall deem proper.
(4) A transporter delivering vehicles not the transporter's own by the
driveaway method where such vehicles are being driven, towed, or
transported singly, or by the saddlemount, towbar, or fullmount methods,
or by any lawful combination thereof, may apply for license plates which
may be transferred from one such vehicle or combination to another for
each delivery without further registration, and the annual license fee for
such license plate shall be as follows:
For the first such set of license plates......................................................$64
For each additional such set of license plates ...........................................38
(5) A truck or truck tractor registered for a gross weight of more than
12,000 pounds that is operated wholly within the corporate limits of a city
or village or within a radius of 25 miles beyond the corporate limits, shall
be classified as a local truck except that in no event shall such vehicles
operated as contract or common carriers outside a radius of three miles
beyond the corporate limits of the city or village in which such vehicles
were based when registered and licensed be considered local trucks or
truck tractors. The secretary of revenue is hereby authorized and directed
to adopt rules and regulations prescribing a procedure for the issuance of
permits by the division of vehicles whereby owners of local trucks or truck
tractors may operate any such vehicle, empty, beyond the radius
hereinbefore prescribed, when such operation is solely for the purpose of
having such vehicle repaired, painted or serviced or for adding additional
equipment thereto. The annual license fee for a local truck or truck tractor,
except as otherwise provided herein, shall be as follows:

HB 2121—Am. by SC 5
For a gross weight of more than 12,000 lbs. and not
more than 16,000 lbs.........................................................................$162
For a gross weight of more than 16,000 lbs. and not
more than 20,000 lbs. .........................................................................202
For a gross weight of more than 20,000 lbs. and not
more than 24,000 lbs. .........................................................................232
For a gross weight of more than 24,000 lbs. and not
more than 26,000 lbs. .........................................................................277
For a gross weight of more than 26,000 lbs. and not
more than 30,000 lbs. .........................................................................277
For a gross weight of more than 30,000 lbs. and not
more than 36,000 lbs...........................................................................315
For a gross weight of more than 36,000 lbs. and not
more than 42,000 lbs. .........................................................................345
For a gross weight of more than 42,000 lbs. and not
more than 48,000 lbs. .........................................................................415
For a gross weight of more than 48,000 lbs. and not
more than 54,000 lbs. .........................................................................515
For a gross weight of more than 54,000 lbs. and not
more than 60,000 lbs...........................................................................615
For a gross weight of more than 60,000 lbs. and not
more than 66,000 lbs. .........................................................................715
For a gross weight of more than 66,000 lbs. and not
more than 74,000 lbs. .........................................................................895
For a gross weight of more than 74,000 lbs. and not
more than 80,000 lbs. ......................................................................1,025
For a gross weight of more than 80,000 lbs. and not
more than 85,500 lbs. ......................................................................1,145
(6) A truck or truck tractor registered for a gross weight of more than
12,000 pounds, which is owned by a person engaged in farming and which
truck or truck tractor is used by such owner to transport agricultural
products produced by such owner or commodities purchased by such
owner for use on the farm owned or rented by the owner of such farm
truck or truck tractor, shall be classified as a farm truck or truck tractor and
the annual license fee for such farm truck shall be as follows:
For a gross weight of more than 12,000 lbs. and not
more than 16,000 lbs. .........................................................................$57
For a gross weight of more than 16,000 lbs. and not
more than 20,000 lbs. .........................................................................142
For a gross weight of more than 20,000 lbs. and not
more than 24,000 lbs. .........................................................................152
For a gross weight of more than 24,000 lbs. and not
more than 26,000 lbs. .........................................................................172

HB 2121—Am. by SC 6
For a gross weight of more than 26,000 lbs. and not
more than 36,000 lbs. .........................................................................172
For a gross weight of more than 36,000 lbs. and not
more than 54,000 lbs. .........................................................................175
For a gross weight of more than 54,000 lbs. and not
more than 60,000 lbs. .........................................................................325
For a gross weight of more than 60,000 lbs. and not
more than 66,000 lbs. .........................................................................505
For a gross weight of more than 66,000 lbs. ...........................................745
A vehicle licensed as a farm truck or truck tractor may be used by the
owner thereof to transport, for charity and without compensation of any
kind, commodities for religious or educational institutions. A truck that is
licensed as a farm truck may also be used for the transportation of sand,
gravel, slag stone, limestone, crushed stone, cinders, black top, dirt or fill
material to a township road maintenance or construction site of the
township in which the owner of such truck resides. Any applicant for
registration of any farm truck or farm truck tractor used in combination
with a trailer or semitrailer shall register the farm truck or farm truck
tractor for a gross weight which shall include the empty weight of the
truck or truck tractor or of the combination of any truck or truck tractor
and any type of trailer or semitrailer, plus the maximum weight of cargo
that will be transported on or with the same. The applicant for registration
of any farm truck or farm truck tractor used to transport a gross weight of
more than 54,000 pounds shall durably letter on the side of the motor
vehicle the words "farm vehicle—not for hire." If an applicant for
registration of any farm truck or farm truck tractor operates such vehicle
for any use or purpose not authorized for a farm truck or farm truck tractor,
such applicant shall pay an additional fee equal to the fee required for the
registration of all trucks or truck tractors not registered as local, 6,000-mile
or farm truck or farm truck tractor motor vehicles, less the amount of the
fee paid at time of registration. Nothing in this or the preceding paragraph
shall authorize a gross weight of a vehicle or combination of vehicles on
the national system of interstate and defense highways greater than
permitted by laws of the United States congress.
(7) Except as provided herein, the annual license fee for each local
urban transit bus used in local urban transit operations exempted under the
provisions of K.S.A. 66-1,109(a), and amendments thereto, shall be based
on the passenger seating capacity of the bus and shall be as follows:
8 or more, but less than 31 passengers ....................................................$35
31 or more, but less than 40 passengers ....................................................50
More than 39 passengers ...........................................................................80
The annual license fee for each local urban transit bus that is owned by
a metropolitan transit authority established pursuant to articles 25 and 28

HB 2121—Am. by SC 7
of chapter 12 or pursuant to article 31 of chapter 13 of the Kansas Statutes
Annotated, and amendments thereto, shall be $2.
(8) For licensing purposes, station wagons with a carrying capacity of
less than 10 passengers shall be subject to registration fees based on the
weight of the vehicles, as provided in subsection (a). Station wagons with
a carrying capacity of 10 or more passengers shall be subject to the truck
classifications and license fees as provided.
(9) For any trailer, semitrailer, travel trailer or pole trailer the annual
license fee shall be as follows:
(A) For any such vehicle with a gross weight of more than 12,000
pounds but less than 54,000 pounds the annual fee shall be $55;
(B) any such vehicle grossing more than 8,000 pounds but not over
12,000 pounds, the annual fee shall be $45; and
(C) for any such vehicle grossing more than 2,000 pounds but not
over 8,000 pounds, the annual fee shall be $35.
Any such vehicle having a gross weight of 2,000 pounds or less may, at
the owner's option, be registered and the fee for such registration shall be
as provided in paragraph (C).
Any trailer, semitrailer or travel trailer owned by a nonresident of this
state and based in another state that is properly registered and licensed in
the state of residence of the owner or in the state where based, may be
operated in this state without being registered or licensed in this state if the
truck or truck tractor propelling the same is properly registered and
licensed in this state, or is registered and licensed in some other state and
is entitled to reciprocal privileges of operation in this state, but this
provision shall not apply to any trailer or semitrailer owned by a
nonresident of this state when such trailer or semitrailer is owned by a
person who has proportionately registered and licensed a fleet of vehicles
under the provisions of K.S.A. 8-1,101 through 8-1,123, and amendments
thereto, or under the terms of any reciprocal or proration agreement made
pursuant thereto.
At the option of the owner, any trailer, semitrailer or pole trailer, with a
gross weight of more than 12,000 pounds, may be issued a multi-year
registration for a five-year period upon payment of the appropriate
registration fee. The fee for a five-year registration of such trailer shall be
five times the annual fee for such trailer. If the annual registration fee is
increased during the multi-year registration period, the owner of the trailer
with such multi-year registration shall be subject to the amount of the
increase of the annual registration fee for the remaining calendar years of
such multi-year registration. When the owner of any trailer, semitrailer or
pole trailer registered under this multi-year provision transfers or assigns
the title, or interest thereto, the registration of such trailer shall expire. The
owner shall remove the license plate from such trailer and forward the

HB 2121—Am. by SC 8
license plate to the division of vehicles or may have such license plate
assigned to another trailer, semitrailer or pole trailer upon the payment of
fees required by law. Any owner of a trailer, semitrailer or pole trailer
where the multi-year registration fee has been paid and the trailer is sold,
junked, repossessed, foreclosed by a mechanic's lien or title transferred by
operation of law, and the registration thereon is not going to be transferred
to another trailer, may secure a refund for the registration fee for the
remaining calendar years by making application to the division of vehicles
on a form and in the manner prescribed by the director of vehicles. The
secretary of revenue may adopt such rules and regulations necessary to
implement the multi-year registration of such trailers, semitrailers and pole
trailers.
(c) Any truck or truck tractor having a gross weight of 4,000 pounds
or over, using solid tires, shall pay a license fee of double the amount
herein charged. The annual fees herein provided for trucks, truck tractors
and trailers not subject to K.S.A. 8-134a, and amendments thereto, shall be
due January 1 of each year and payable on or before the last day of
February in each year. If the fee is not paid by such date a penalty of $1
shall be added to the fee charged herein for each month or fraction thereof
and until December 31 of each registration year. The annual registration
fee for all passenger vehicles and vehicles subject to K.S.A. 8-134a, and
amendments thereto, shall be due on or before the last day of the month in
which the registration plate expires and shall be due for other vehicles as
provided by K.S.A. 8-134, and amendments thereto. If the registration fee
is not paid by such date a penalty of $1 shall be added to the fee charged
herein for each month or fraction thereof until such registration fee is paid.
Members of the armed forces of the United States shall be permitted to
apply for registration at any time and be subject to registration fee, less
penalties, applicable at the time the application is made. If any motorcycle,
motorized bicycle, trailer, semitrailer, travel trailer, or pole trailer is either
purchased or acquired after the anniversary or renewal date in any
registration year there shall immediately become due and payable a
registration fee as follows: If purchased or acquired between the
anniversary or renewal date of any registration year and the first six
months of such registration year, the annual fee provided herein; if
purchased or acquired during the last six months of any registration year,
50% of such annual fee. If any truck or truck tractor, except trucks subject
to K.S.A. 8-134a, and amendments thereto, is purchased or acquired prior
to April 1 of any year the fee shall be the annual fee provided herein, but if
such truck or truck tractor is purchased or acquired after the end of March
of any year, the license fee for such year shall be reduced 1/ for each

calendar month which has elapsed since the beginning of the year. If any
truck registered for a gross weight of 12,000 pounds or less or passenger

HB 2121—Am. by SC 9
vehicle is purchased or acquired and less than 12 months remain in the
registration period, the fee shall be 1/ of the annual fee for each calendar

month remaining in the registration period.
(d) The owner of any motorcycle, motorized bicycle, passenger
vehicle, truck, truck tractor, trailer, semitrailer, or electrically propelled
vehicle who fails to pay the registration fee or fees herein provided on the
date when the same become due and payable shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be subject to a penalty in
the sum of $1 for each month or fraction thereof during which such fee has
remained unpaid after it became due and payable; and in addition thereto
shall be subject to such other punishment as is provided in this act. Upon
the transfer of motorcycles, motorized bicycles, passenger vehicles,
trailers, semitrailers, trucks or truck tractors, on which registration fees
have been paid for the year in which the transfer is made, either: (1) To a
corporation by one or more persons, solely in exchange for stock or
securities in such corporation; or (2) by one corporation to another
corporation when all of the assets of such corporation are transferred to the
other corporation, then in either case, paragraph (1) or (2) the corporation
shall be exempt from the payment of registration fees on such vehicles for
the year in which such transfer is made. Applications for transfer or
registration shall be accompanied by a fee of $1.50. When the registration
of a vehicle has expired at midnight on the last day of any registration
year, and such vehicle is not thereafter operated upon the highways, any
application for renewal of registration made subsequent to the anniversary
or renewal date of any registration year following the expiration of such
registration and for succeeding registration years in which such vehicle has
not been registered shall be accompanied by an affidavit of nonoperation
and nonuse, and such application for renewal or registration shall be
received by the division of vehicles upon payment of the proper fees for
the current registration year and without penalty.
(e) Any nonresident of Kansas purchasing a vehicle from a Kansas
resident and desiring to secure registration on the vehicle in the state of
such person's residence may make application in the office of any county
treasurer for a sixty-day temporary registration. The county treasurer upon
presentation of evidence of ownership in the applicant and evidence the
sales tax has been paid, if due, shall charge and collect a fee of $3 for each
sixty-day temporary license and issue a sticker or paper registration as may
be determined by the director of vehicles, and the registration so issued
shall be valid for a period of 60 days from the date of issuance.
(f) Any owner of any motor vehicle that is subject to taxation under
the provisions of article 51 of chapter 79 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated,
and amendments thereto, or any other truck or truck tractor where the
annual registration fee has been paid and the vehicle is sold, junked,

HB 2121—Am. by SC 10
repossessed, foreclosed by a mechanic's lien or title transferred by
operation of law, and the registration thereon is not going to be transferred
to another vehicle may secure a refund for the registration fee for the
remaining portion of the year by making application to the division of
vehicles on a form and in the manner prescribed by the director of
vehicles, accompanied by all license plates and attachments issued in
connection therewith. If the owner of the registration becomes deceased
and the vehicle is not going to be used on the highway, and title is not
being currently transferred, the proper representative of the estate shall be
entitled to the refund. The refund shall be made only for the period of time
remaining in the registration year from the date of completion and filing of
the application with and delivery of the license plate and attachments to
the division of vehicles. Where the registration is secured under a quarterly
payment annual registration fee, as provided for in K.S.A. 8-143a, and
amendments thereto, such refund shall be made on the quarterly fee paid
and unused and all remaining quarterly payments shall be canceled. Any
truck or truck tractor having the registration fee paid on quarterly payment
basis, all quarterly payments due or a fraction of quarterly payment due
shall be paid before title may be transferred, except that in case of death,
the filing of the application and returning of the license plate and
attachment shall cancel the remaining annual payments due. Whenever a
truck or truck tractor, where the registration is secured on a quarterly
payment of the annual registration, the one repossessing the truck or truck
tractor, or foreclosing by a mechanic's lien, or securing title by court order,
the mortgagor or the assigns of the mortgagor, or the one securing title
may pay the balance due on date of application for title, but the payments
for the remaining portion of the year shall not be canceled unless
application is made and the license plate and attachments are surrendered.
Nothing in this subsection shall apply when registration is secured under
the provisions of K.S.A. 8-1,101 through 8-1,123, and amendments
thereto. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section,
no refund shall be made under the provisions of this section where the
amount thereof does not exceed $5. The division of vehicles shall furnish
such blank forms as may be required under the provisions of this
subsection as it deems necessary to be completed by the applicant.
Whenever a registration which has been secured on a quarterly basis shall
be canceled as provided in this subsection, the division of vehicles shall
notify the county treasurer issuing the original registration of such
cancellation so that the county treasurer may, and the county treasurer shall
cancel the registration of such vehicle in the county treasurer's office and
release any lien issued in connection with such registration.
(g) Every owner of a travel trailer designed for or intended to be
moved upon any highway in this state shall, before the same is so moved,

HB 2121—Am. by SC 11
apply for and obtain the proper registration thereof as provided in this act,
except when such unit is permitted to be moved under the special
provisions relating to secured parties, manufacturers, dealers and
nonresidents contained in this act. At the time of registering any travel
trailer for the purpose of moving any such vehicle upon any highway in
this state, the owner thereof shall indicate on the registration form whether
or not such vehicle is being moved permanently to a location outside of the
county in which such vehicle is being registered. No such vehicle which
the owner thereof intends to move to a permanent location outside the
boundaries of such county shall be registered for movement on the
highways of this state until all taxes levied against such vehicle have been
paid. A copy of such registration form shall be sent to the county clerk or
assessor of the county to which such vehicle is being moved. When such
travel trailer is used for living quarters and not operated on the highways,
the owner shall be exempt from the license fees as provided in subsection
(b)(9) so long as such travel trailer is not operated on the highway.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 8-145 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 8-145. (a) All registration and certificates of title fees shall be
paid to the division of vehicles, a contractor of the division or the county
treasurer of the county in which the applicant for registration resides or has
an office or principal place of business within this state. The division,
contractor or the county treasurer shall issue a receipt to the applicant for
such fees paid.
(b) The county treasurer, division or contractor shall deposit $.75 out
of each license application, $.75 out of each application for transfer of
license plate and $2 out of each application for a certificate of title,
collected under this act, in a special fund, which fund is hereby
appropriated for the use of the county treasurer, division or contractor in
paying for necessary help and expenses incidental to the administration of
duties in accordance with the provisions of this law. The county treasurer
shall receive extra compensation for the services performed in
administering the provisions of this act, which compensation shall be in
addition to any other compensation provided by any other law, except that
the county treasurer shall receive as additional compensation for
administering the motor vehicle title and registration laws and fees, a sum
computed as follows: The county treasurer, during the month of December,
shall determine the amount to be retained for extra compensation not to
exceed the following amounts each year for calendar year 2006 or any
calendar year thereafter: The sum of $110 per hundred registrations for the
first 5,000 registrations; the sum of $90 per hundred registrations for the
second 5,000 registrations; the sum of $5 per hundred for the third 5,000
registrations; and the sum of $2 per hundred registrations for all
registrations thereafter. In no event, however, shall any county treasurer be

HB 2121—Am. by SC 12
entitled to receive more than $15,000 additional annual compensation.
If more than one person shall hold the office of county treasurer during
any one calendar year, such compensation shall be prorated among such
persons in proportion to the number of weeks served. The total amount of
compensation paid the treasurer together with the amounts expended in
paying for other necessary help and expenses incidental to the
administration of the duties of the county treasurer in accordance with the
provisions of this act, shall not exceed the amount deposited in such
special fund. Any balance remaining in such fund at the close of any
calendar year shall be withdrawn and credited to the general fund of the
county prior to June 1 of the following calendar year.
(c) The county treasurer, division or contractor shall remit the
remainder of all such fees collected, together with the original copy of all
applications, to the secretary of revenue. The secretary of revenue shall
remit all such fees remitted to the state treasurer in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto. Upon receipt of
each such remittance, the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in
the state treasury to the credit of the state highway fund, except as
provided in subsection (d).
(d) (1) Three dollars and fifty cents of each certificate of title fee
collected and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be remitted to the
state treasurer who shall credit such $3.50 to the Kansas highway patrol
motor vehicle fund. Three dollars of each certificate of title fee collected
and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be remitted to the state
treasurer who shall credit such $3 to the VIPS/CAMA technology
hardware fund.
(2) For repossessed vehicles, $3 of each certificate of title fee
collected shall be retained by the contractor or county treasurer who
processed the application.
(3) Three dollars and fifty cents of each reassignment form fee
collected and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be remitted to the
state treasurer who shall credit such $3.50 to the Kansas highway patrol
motor vehicle fund. Three dollars of each reassignment form fee collected
and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be remitted to the state
treasurer who shall credit such $3 to the VIPS/CAMA technology
hardware fund.
(4) Four dollars of each division of vehicles modernization surcharge
collected and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be remitted to the
state treasurer who shall credit such $4 to the state highway fund.
(5) Two dollars of each Kansas highway patrol staffing and training
surcharge collected and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be
remitted to the state treasurer who shall credit such $2 to the Kansas
highway patrol staffing and training fund.

HB 2121—Am. by SC 13
(6) One dollar and twenty-five cents of each surcharge collected and
remitted to the secretary of revenue pursuant to K.S.A. 8-1,177, and
amendments thereto, shall be remitted to the state treasurer who shall
credit such $1.25 to the state general fund.
(7) Fees collected in K.S.A. 8-135 and 8-145, and amendments
thereto, that are collected by the division for commercial motor vehicles or
vehicles that are part of a commercial fleet, shall be remitted to the state
treasurer, who shall credit such amounts to the commercial vehicle
administrative fund.
(8) Fees collected in K.S.A. 8-135 and 8-145, and amendments
thereto, that are collected by the division for vehicles that are part of a fleet
rental pursuant to K.S.A. 8-1,189, and amendments thereto, shall be
remitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit such amounts to the fleet
rental vehicle administration fund.
(9) Fees collected in K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, for those
motorcycles that are all-electric motorcycles pursuant to K.S.A. 8-143(a)
(3), and amendments thereto, for those motor vehicles that are electric
hybrid or plug-in electric hybrid vehicles pursuant to K.S.A. 8-143(a)(4)
(C), and amendments thereto, for those motor vehicles that are all-electric
vehicles pursuant to K.S.A. 8-143(a)(4)(D), and amendments thereto, and
for those truck or truck tractors that are all-electric, an electric hybrid or
a plug-in electric hybrid with a gross weight of 12,000 pounds or less
pursuant to K.S.A. 8-143(b)(1), and amendments thereto, shall be remitted
to the state treasurer who shall credit to the state highway fund amounts
specified in K.S.A. 79-34,142, and amendments thereto, and amounts
specified in K.S.A. 79-34,142, and amendments thereto, to the special city
and county highway fund to be apportioned and distributed in the manner
provided in K.S.A. 79-3425c, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 8-143 and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 8-145 are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after
January 1, 2026, and its publication in the statute book.